New York, session 2025-2026, S9359.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 195.18 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 195.18 Obstruction of governmental duties at the scene of a crime. 4 1. A person is guilty of obstruction of governmental duties at the 5 scene of a crime when such person acts under the color of law to prevent 6 a police officer from accessing the scene of a crime or any evidence at 7 the scene of a crime. 8 2. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 9 the following meanings: 10 (a) "Scene of a crime" shall mean a location or locations where a 11 crime is alleged to have occurred. 12 (b) "Police officer" shall have the same meaning as such term is 13 defined in section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law. 14 Obstruction of governmental duties at the scene of a crime is a class 15 A misdemeanor. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15083-01-6